Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1519
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 59-1519 to 59-1525:

(1) Cigarettes has the same meaning as in section 77-2601;

(2) Package has the same meaning as in 15 U.S.C. 1332(4), as such section existed on May 1, 2001; and

(3) Person has the same meaning as in section 77-2601.

Laws 2001, LB 358, § 1.